Hawaii statutes.
[§468L-26] Quarterly report filing
requirements for charter tour operators. Not later than forty-five days
after the end of each quarter, each registered travel agency engaging in the
business of a charter tour operator, at its own expense, shall file a quarterly
report that shall cover the immediately preceding quarter. Each report shall
include a statement by an independent certified public accountant that the
charter tour client trust account has been maintained in accordance with the
requirements of sections 468L-5, 468L-23, and 468L-24, or specifying the
grounds on which such a statement cannot be made. [L 1999, c 258, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next